Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2069.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 31 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER DAUTOMATED VEHICLE NOISE ENFORCEMENT SYSTEMSSec.3131. Definitions.3132. Application process.3133. Approval process.3134. System administrator.3135. Implementation of automated vehicle noise enforcement system.3136. Citations.123456789101112131415161718 3137. Fines.3138. Defenses.3139. Hearings.3140. Evidence.3141. Reports by department.3142. Rules and regulations.3143. Expiration.§ 3131. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Automated vehicle noise enforcement system." A system using one or more stationary cameras and decibel meters or similar equipment to record images and establish meter readings to enforce section 4523 (relating to exhaust systems, mufflers and noise control) by determining whether a vehicle is in violation of vehicle noise limits."Citation." A notice of a violation of vehicle noise limits as a result of the use of an automated vehicle noise enforcement system."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township in this Commonwealth."System administrator." A person designated by a municipality to administer the automated vehicle noise enforcement system of the municipality."Vehicle noise limits." The limits specified in 67 Pa. Code § 157.11 (relating to vehicular noise limits), in accordance with 67 Pa. Code Ch. 157 (relating to established sound levels).§ 3132. Application process.(a) Ordinance or resolution required.--A municipality may 20250HB2069PN2652 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enact an ordinance or resolution regulating vehicular noise limits and authorizing the use of an automated vehicular noise enforcement system, subject to the approval of the department in accordance with this subchapter.(b) Application.--(1) Following the enactment of an ordinance or resolution under subsection (a) and before the installation and use of the automated vehicular noise enforcement system, the municipality must apply to the department for approval of the installation and use.(2) The application under this subsection must be in the form and manner as determined by the department and must contain the following:(i) A copy of the enacted ordinance or resolution.(ii) Each designated intersection within the municipality at which automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment is proposed to be located.(iii) Any relevant circumstances meriting the installation and use of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system.(iv) Any other information regarding the municipality, including the size and population of the municipality.§ 3133. Approval process.(a) Review.--Within 60 days of receiving an application under section 3132 (relating to application process), the department shall review the application.(b) Determination.--Following the review under subsection (a), the department shall determine:(1) Whether each proposed intersection is an appropriate 20250HB2069PN2652 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 location for the location of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment.(2) Whether a more appropriate intersection exists within the municipality for the location of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment and, if so, the identification of the more appropriate location.(c) Additional considerations.--In making the determination under subsection (b), the department may consider the factors under section 3132(b)(2)(iii) and (iv).(d) Notice.--The department shall provide written notice of the determination under this section to the applicant, which must include:(1) The data on which the determination is based.(2) If the application is denied, in whole or in part, the reasons for the denial.(e) Effect.--A municipality may not install or use automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment unless approved by the department.§ 3134. System administrator.(a) Designation.--As soon as practicable after approval by the department of the installation and use of an automated vehicle noise enforcement system in a municipality, the municipality shall designate a system administrator for the automated vehicle noise enforcement system.(b) Duties.--A system administrator shall:(1) Supervise the purchase, installation and management of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment.(2) Hire or otherwise designate personnel and contract with third parties as necessary to assist in the implementation and management of the automated vehicle noise 20250HB2069PN2652 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement system.(3) Process notices of violations and fines incurred in accordance with this subchapter and otherwise assist in the enforcement of this subchapter.(4) Serve as liaison between the municipality and the department.(5) Issue reports in accordance with subsection (c).(6) Ensure that the compensation paid to the manufacturer or vendor of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system or to any contracted third party:(i) Is not based upon the number of violation notices issued or a portion or percentage of the fines generated by the violation notices as a result of the use of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system.(ii) Is based upon the value of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment and the services provided or rendered in support of the automated noise enforcement system.(c) Reports.--(1) No later than March 30 of each year, each system administrator shall issue a report to the secretary on the automated vehicle noise enforcement system.(2) Each report under this subsection must contain the following information:(i) The name and contact information of the municipality and system administrator.(ii) The class and size of the municipality.(iii) The date of installation of automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment.(iv) Each designated intersection at which 20250HB2069PN2652 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment is located.(v) The average daily traffic at each designated intersection, if known.(vi) The number of violations that have occurred during the immediately prior year at each designated intersection.(vii) The amount of fines incurred during the immediately prior year at each designated intersection.(viii) A summary of the number and amount of fines that were collected during the immediately prior year.(ix) A summary of the number and amount of fines that were uncollected during the immediately prior year.(x) The number and disposition of hearings and appeals that have occurred during the immediately prior year.(xi) The amount of money paid to each vendor, manufacturer or contracted third party associated with the automated vehicle noise enforcement system during the immediately prior year.(xii) The costs associated with the installation and use of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system during the immediately prior year.(xiii) The revenue limit in accordance with section 3137(h) (relating to fines).(xiv) Any other information that the department deems appropriate.(3) Each report under this subsection shall be:(i) Accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, 20250HB2069PN2652 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(ii) Posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the municipality.§ 3135. Implementation of automated vehicle noise enforcement system.(a) Public notice.--A municipality may not use an automated vehicle noise enforcement system for a designated intersection unless an appropriate sign is posted in a conspicuous place on the approach to the designated intersection that notifies the public of the existence of installed automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment at the designated intersection.(b) Frontal view.--An automated vehicle noise enforcement system may not be used in any manner that takes a recorded image that is a frontal view of a vehicle as evidence of the commission of a violation under this subchapter.(c) Limitations on use.-- Subject to subsection (d): (1) Camera equ ipment deployed as part of an automated vehicle noise enforcement system must be incapable of automated or user-controlled remote intersection surveillance by means of recorded video images.(2) Recorded images collected as part of an automated vehicle noise enforcement system may only record traffic violations and may not be used for any other surveillance purposes.(3) If a municipality or an authorized agent or employee of a municipality maintains information prepared under this subchapter or information relating to violations under this subchapter, including recorded images, written records, reports or facsimiles, names and addresses, the information:(i) Shall be for the exclusive use of the 20250HB2069PN2652 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality, authorized agent or employee of the municipality and appropriate law enforcement officials for the purpose of discharging duties in accordance with this subchapter and any ordinance or resolution of the municipality.(ii) Shall be exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(iii) Shall not be discoverable by court order or otherwise, or offered in evidence, in an action or proceeding that is not directly related to a violation of this subchapter or any ordinance or resolution of the municipality.(d) Construction.--The restrictions specified under subsection (c) shall not be construed to preclude a court of competent jurisdiction from issuing an order directing that the information be provided to law enforcement officials if the information is reasonably described and is requested solely in connection with a criminal law enforcement action.(e) Destruction of recorded images.--Within 30 days following the final disposition of a case involving a recorded event through the use of an automated vehicle noise enforcement system by a municipality, the municipality shall:(1) Destroy the associated recorded images.(2) File notice with the Department of State that the recorded images have been destroyed in accordance with this subsection.(f) Obtained information.--Information obtained through an automated vehicle noise enforcement system regarding a registered vehicle owner:20250HB2069PN2652 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Shall not be deemed the property of the manufacturer or vendor of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system.(2) May only be used in accordance with this subchapter.§ 3136. Citations.(a) Issuance.--In enforcing vehicle noise limits through the use of an automated vehicle noise enforcement system in a municipality, the system administrator of the municipality shall prepare a citation, which shall be issued only by a law enforcement officer employed by the law enforcement agency operated by the municipality, to the registered owner of the vehicle identified in a recorded image produced by the automated vehicle noise enforcement system as evidence of a violation under this subchapter.(b) Contents.--Each citation must contain or have attached to it:(1) A copy of the recorded image from the automated vehicle noise enforcement system showing the vehicle.(2) The registration number of the vehicle and state of issuance of the vehicle registration.(3) The date, time and place of the alleged violation.(4) Notice that the citation is for an alleged violation of vehicle noise limits under this subchapter.(5) Instructions for how to complete and return the citation.(6) The following notice in substantially the following form:This citation is directed to you as the registered owner of the vehicle that is alleged to be in violation of vehicle noise limits. This citation must be returned, in person or by mail, within 30 days of 20250HB2069PN2652 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 issuance, along with the payment of the specified fine or the completion of the section requesting a hearing to contest liability.(7) A certificate, or a facsimile of a certificate, based upon inspection of recorded images produced by the automated vehicle noise enforcement system and sworn to or affirmed by a law enforcement officer employed by the law enforcement agency operated by the municipality, that also includes a statement that the automated vehicle noise enforcement system was operating correctly at the time of the alleged violation.(c) Notice.--(1) In the case of a citation involving a vehicle registered in this Commonwealth, the citation must be sent, by first class mail within 30 days after the occurrence of the alleged violation or within 30 days after the discovery of the identity of the registered owner of the vehicle, whichever is later, to the address of the registered owner as listed in the records of the department.(2) In the case of a citation involving a vehicle registered in a jurisdiction other than this Commonwealth, the citation must be sent, by first class mail within 30 days after the discovery of the identity of the registered owner of the vehicle, to the address of the registered owner as listed in the records of the other jurisdiction.§ 3137. Fines.(a) Authorization.--A fine is not authorized under this subsection during any of the following:(1) The first 60 days of operation of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system at the initial designated 20250HB2069PN2652 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intersection.(2) The first 30 days of operation of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system at each additional designated intersection following the operation at the initial designated intersection.(b) Warning.--A warning may be issued to a person violating this subchapter during any of the periods specified under subsection (a).(c) Owner liability.--The owner of the vehicle that is the subject of a citation shall be liable for the penalty imposed under this section unless the owner is convicted of the same violation under another section of this title or has a defense under section 3138 (relating to defenses).(d) Amount.--A person violating this subchapter shall be subject to a fine of $100 for each violation, unless a lesser amount is set by the ordinance of the municipality in which the violation occurred.(e) Effect.--A fine imposed on an individual under this section shall not:(1) Be deemed a criminal conviction for the individual.(2) Be made part of the individual's operating record under section 1535 (relating to schedule of convictions and points).(3) Subject the individual to an adjustment in merit rating for the insurance purposes.(4) Subject the individual to the imposition of surcharge points in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage.(f) Portion.--Fines collected under this section shall not be subject to 42 Pa.C.S. § 3571 (relating to Commonwealth 20250HB2069PN2652 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 portion of fines, etc.) or 3573 (relating to municipal corporation portion of fines, etc.).(g) Payment.--The owner of the vehicle to whom a citation has been issued may admit responsibility for the violation and, if so, shall pay the fine provided in the citation. The following apply:(1) Payment may be made to the municipality in person, electronically or by mail, as directed in the citation.(2) The citation must be returned to the municipality at the time that payment is remitted or as soon as practicable thereafter.(3) Payment by mail may only be made by money order, credit card or check made payable to the municipality.(4) Payment shall operate as a final disposition of the case.(h) Revenue limit.--A municipality may not collect an amount equal to or greater than 5% of its annual budget from the collection of revenue from the issuance of citations and payment of fines under this subchapter.§ 3138. Defenses.The following are defenses to a violation under this section:(1) The registered owner of the vehicle named in the citation was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation. The following apply:(i) The municipality may require the owner to submit evidence that the owner was not the driver at the time of the violation.(ii) The municipality may not require the owner to disclose the identity of the operator of the vehicle at the time of the violation.20250HB2069PN2652 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The vehicle that is the subject of the citation was reported to a law enforcement agency as stolen, and was not recovered, prior to the time of the violation.(3) The person who received the citation was not the owner or lessor of the vehicle at the time of the violation.§ 3139. Hearings.(a) Right to hearing.--A registered owner to whom a citation is issued may, within 30 days of the issuance of the citation, contest liability and request a hearing by completing the appropriate section of the citation and returning the citation to the municipality as directed.(b) Duty of system administrator.--Upon receipt of a hearing request, the system administrator shall:(1) In a timely manner, schedule the matter before a hearing officer designated by the municipality.(2) Provide written notice of the date, time and place of the hearing by first class mail to the person requesting the hearing.(c) Process.--The following apply to a hearing under this section:(1) The hearing shall be informal.(2) The rules of evidence shall not apply during the hearing.(3) The decision of the hearing officer shall be final, subject to appeal to the appropriate magisterial district judge.(4) If a person requests in writing that the decision of the hearing officer be appealed, the system administrator shall file the citation and supporting documents with the appropriate magisterial district judge who shall hear and 20250HB2069PN2652 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 decide the matter de novo.§ 3140. Evidence.(a) Certificate.--The certificate or facsimile of the certificate under section 3136(b)(7) (relating to citations) shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained in the certificate or facsimile of the certificate.(b) Mailing.--A manual or automatic record of mailing in accordance with section 3136(c), which is prepared by the system administrator in the ordinary course of business, shall be prima facie evidence of mailing under section 3136(c) and shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding as to the facts contained in the mailed citation.(c) Recorded image.--A recorded image evidencing a violation under this subchapter shall be admissible in any judicial or administrative proceeding to adjudicate the liability for the violation.§ 3141. Reports by department.(a) Issuance and contents.--No later than June 30 of each year, the department shall issue a report on automated vehicle noise enforcement systems in this Commonwealth which contains:(1) A summary of the information contained in the reports submitted in accordance with section 3134(c) (relating to system administrator).(2) An evaluation of the automated vehicle noise enforcement system within each municipality that is using the automated vehicle noise enforcement system, based on the information contained in the reports submitted in accordance with section 3134(c).(3) Any recommendations regarding automated vehicle noise enforcement systems and this subchapter.20250HB2069PN2652 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Submittal.--Each report under subsection (a) shall be submitted to:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Public notice.--Each report under subsection (a) shall be:(1) Accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(2) Posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.§ 3142. Rules and regulations.The department may adopt or promulgate any rule or regulation necessary to implement, administer and enforce this subchapter, including:(1) The form to apply for the installation and use of an automated vehicle noise enforcement system.(2) The appropriate signage and location of the signage that notifies the public of the existence of installed automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment at a designated intersection.(3) Testing procedures and standards to determine whether automated vehicle noise enforcement system equipment is operating correctly.(4) Forms for citations, certificates or facsimiles of certificates, notices and other documentation under this subchapter.20250HB2069PN2652 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 3143. Expiration.This subchapter shall expire five years after the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2069PN2652 - 16 - 1234